Maryland, session 2026, HB1151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. hb1151*

HOUSE BILL 1151
(a) The Division of Health Care Financing and Medicaid within the Maryland
Department of Health Maryland Health Care Commission and the Maryland Medical
Assistance Program jointly shall study the impact of requiring the Maryland Medical
Assistance Program to provide reimbursement for room and board services provided by a
hospice house, as defined in COMAR 10.07.22.02.
(b) The study required under subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) quantify analyze overall Maryland Medical Assistance Program
savings per enrollee death as a result of the use of hospice care; and associated with hospice
care utilization during the last 6 months of life compared with costs associated with other
services provided to Program enrollees during the last 6 months of life, including the impact
on:
(i) avoided inpatient hospital stays;
(ii) emergency department utilization; and
(iii) intensive treatments near the end of life;
(2) analyze the projected fiscal impact of the provision of reimbursement
for hospice house room and board services, including any potential offsets or net savings;
(3) examine how the provision of reimbursement for room and board
services would:
(i) affect hospice hospital readmission rates;
(ii) improve hospice length of stay;
(iii) improve early access to hospice services;
(iv) result in a reduction in deaths in hospitals; and
(iv) (v) result in a reduction in emergency department utilization; and
(4) include a comparison of other states that provide reimbursement for
hospice house room and board service, including a comparison of:
(i) payment models;
(ii) utilization outcomes; and
(iii) cost impacts.

HOUSE BILL 1151 3
(c) On or before September 30 December 1, 2026, the Maryland Department of
Health shall report its findings to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.